District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.23

Rulemaking.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including:

(1)

Minimum standards of operation of an emergency medical services agency, including:

(A)

Medical director and staff qualifications and responsibilities;

(B)

Premises and equipment standards;

(C)

Hours and scope of operation;

(D)

Safety and health standards; and

(E)

Record keeping and reporting requirements;

(2)

Minimum standards of operation of an emergency medical response vehicle, including:

(A)

Operator and attendant qualifications;

(B)

Vehicle, equipment, and supplies requirements;

(C)

Safety and health standards; and

(D)

Record keeping and reporting requirements;

(3)

Minimum standards of qualification and performance for emergency medical services personnel at each classification level, including:

(A)

Permissible scope of practice and practice settings;

(B)

Education and training;

(C)

Competency evaluations;

(D)

Health requirements;

(E)

Character standards; and

(F)

Recertification requirements;

(4)

Minimum standards of qualification and performance for emergency medical services instructors, including:

(A)

Education and training;

(B)

Competency evaluations; and

(C)

Recertification requirements;

(5)

Minimum standards of operation of an emergency medical services training facility, including:

(A)

Premises and equipment standards;

(B)

Director and instructor qualifications and responsibilities;

(C)

Curricula and course contents;

(D)

Competency evaluations; and

(E)

Record keeping and reporting requirements;

(6)

Licensure and certification application, issuance, and renewal procedures;

(7)

Grounds and procedures for denial, non-renewal, suspension, and revocation of a license or certification;

(8)

Standards and requirements for the operation of a 24-hour emergency response vehicle service;

(9)

Minimum standards and criteria for the designation of specialized trauma care facilities, and for the designation of other specialized emergency medical care facilities as considered warranted by the Mayor;

(10)

Standards and criteria for emergency medical care data collection;

(11)

Encouraging health-care facilities, including long-term care and assisted living facilities, to provide or procure inter-facility transport services independent of the 911 emergency system for their non-emergent needs; provided, that this does not limit the authority of the Medical Director of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department pursuant to §§ 5-401, 5-402, 5-404, 5-404.01, and 5-407; and

(12)

The establishment of a fee schedule to recover the costs of regulating emergency medical services agencies, emergency medical response vehicles, emergency medical services personnel, and emergency medical services training facilities and instructors pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 24, 56 DCR 1167